Utah statutes.
63H-1-705.   Audit report.

(1)  The authority shall, within 180 days after the end of the authority's fiscal year, file a copy of the audit report with the county auditor, the State Tax Commission, the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property from which the authority collects tax increment.

(2)  Each audit report under Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  the tax increment collected by the authority for each project area;

(b)  the outstanding principal amount of bonds issued or other loans incurred to finance the costs associated with the authority's project areas; and

(c)  the actual amount expended for:

(i)  acquisition of property;

(ii)  site improvements or site preparation costs;

(iii)  installation of public utilities or other public improvements; and

(iv)  administrative costs of the authority.



Enacted by Chapter 23, 2007 General Session

